Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 3 Decrees

23-4-30.
Nature of decree; signature and entry.

A decree is the judgment of the judge in equitable proceedings upon the facts ascertained and should be signed by him and entered on the minutes of the court.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 4122; Code 1868, § 4153; Code 1873, § 4212; Code 1882, § 4212; Civil Code 1895, § 4851; Civil Code 1910, § 5424; Code 1933, § 37-1201.

Cross references.

Verdict and judgment generally, T. 9,
C. 12.

23-4-31.
Power of court to mold and enforce decrees.

A superior court shall have full power to mold its decrees so as to meet the exigencies of each case and shall have full power to enforce its decrees when rendered.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 4123; Code 1868, § 4154; Code 1873, § 4213; Code 1882, § 4213; Civil Code 1895, § 4853; Civil Code 1910, § 5426; Code 1933, § 37-1203.

Law reviews.

For article comparing sections of the Georgia Civil Practice Act with preexisting provisions of the Georgia Code, see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 295 (1967).

23-4-32.
Decree affecting property outside jurisdiction.

Equity may decree in cases of fraud, trust, or contract, although property not within the jurisdiction may be affected by the decree.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 4854; Civil Code 1910, § 5427; Code 1933, § 37-1204.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decision in Engel v. Scheuerman,

40 Ga. 206

(1869).

23-4-33.
Decree in will or contract matters; consent of guardian or guardian ad litem.

When it becomes impossible to carry out any last will and testament in whole or in part, and in all matters of contract, the judges of the superior courts, and the judge of the Georgia State-wide Business Court in matters of contract only, shall have power to render any decree that may be necessary and legal, provided that all parties in interest shall consent thereto in writing and there shall be no issue as to the facts or, if there is such an issue, that there shall be a like consent in writing that the judge presiding may hear and determine such facts, subject to a review on appeal, as in other cases. In all cases where minors are interested, the consent of the guardian at law or the guardian ad litem shall be obtained before the decree is rendered.

History.

Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 221, § 1; Code 1868, § 4155; Code 1873, § 4214; Code 1882, § 4214; Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 69, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 4855; Civil Code 1910, § 5428; Code 1933, § 37-1205; Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 3-8/HB 927; Ga. L. 2019, p. 845, § 3-6/HB 239.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 7, 2019, inserted “, and the judge of the Georgia State-wide Business Court in matters of contract only,” in the middle of the first sentence of this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 1-2/HB 927, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Appellate Jurisdiction Reform Act of 2016.’ ”

Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 6-1/HB 927, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Part III of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2017, and shall apply to cases in which a notice of appeal or application to appeal is filed on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 205 (2016).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2019).

23-4-34.
Interlocutory decrees and orders.

At any stage in the progress of an action seeking equitable relief, if any portion of the same is ready for or requires a decree, the court may hear and determine such matters and pass such interlocutory decree or order as may advance the cause and expedite a final hearing. If no issue of fact is involved, the verdict of a jury shall be unnecessary.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 4111; Code 1868, § 4142; Code 1873, § 4201; Code 1882, § 4201; Civil Code 1895, § 4847; Civil Code 1910, § 5420; Code 1933, § 37-1101.

Cross references.

Special verdicts in civil cases, §

9-11-49

.

Law reviews.

For article, “Injunction Procedure in Georgia,” see 13 Ga. B.J. 300 (1951).

For article surveying development of equity and the right to trial by jury in equity actions in Georgia, and advocating use of jury to try issues of fact in equitable actions, see 8 Mercer L. Rev. 225 (1957).

For survey article on trial practice and procedure, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 299 (1982).

23-4-35.
Confirmation of sales under decrees.

Sales under decrees in equity shall be subject to confirmation by the judge, who has a large discretion vested in him in reference thereto. Such sales shall not be consummated until confirmed by him.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 4856; Civil Code 1910, § 5429; Code 1933, § 37-1206.

History of Code section.

This Code section is derived from the decisions in Walter v. Hargrove,

61 Ga. 267

(1878) and Holmes v. Harris,

70 Ga. 309

(1883).

Law reviews.

For survey article on business associations, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 13 (1982).

For article, “Buying Distressed Commercial Real Estate:
What are the Alternatives?,” see 16 (No. 4) Ga. St. B.J. 18 (2010).

23-4-36.
Decree transferable; lien.

A decree shall be transferable like other judgments and, when for money, shall constitute a like lien.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 4126; Code 1868, § 4158; Code 1873, § 4217; Code 1882, § 4217; Civil Code 1895, § 4859; Civil Code 1910, § 5432; Code 1933, § 37-1209.

23-4-37.
Attachments for contempt; executions against property.

Every decree or order of a superior court or the Georgia State-wide Business Court in equitable proceedings may be enforced by attachment against the person for contempt. Decrees for money may be enforced by execution against the property. If a decree is partly for money and partly for the performance of a duty, the former may be enforced by execution and the latter by attachment or other process.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 3032, 4125; Code 1868, §§ 3044, 4157; Code 1873, §§ 3099, 4216; Code 1882, §§ 3099, 4216; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3944, 4858; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4541, 5431; Code 1933, §§ 37-123, 37-1208; Ga. L. 2019, p. 845, § 3-7/HB 239.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 7, 2019, inserted “or the Georgia State-wide Business Court” near the beginning of the first sentence of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2019).

23-4-38.
Enforcement of extraordinary remedies.

Injunction, ne exeat, prohibition, and other extraordinary remedies may be enforced by attachment for contempt.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 3157, 4127; Code 1868, §§ 3169, 4159; Code 1873, §§ 3237, 4218; Code 1882, §§ 3237, 4218; Civil Code 1895, §§ 4860, 4899; Civil Code 1910, §§ 5433, 5474; Code 1933, § 37-1210.